Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-126
Simultaneous death; sections not applicable if decedent provides otherwise.

Sections 30-121 to 30-128 shall not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds, or contracts of insurance wherein provision has been made for distribution of property different from the provisions of sections 30-121 to 30-128.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 6, p. 306.